Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF863.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 462A.12, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4. No person shall operate on the waters of this state under the jurisdiction of the commission any vessel displaying or reflecting a blue light or flashing blue light unless such vessel is an authorized emergency vessel. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 863, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor